Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 4

Audit and Rates

7-82-401. Audited annual financial report — Accounting manual — Books and records.

The commissioners of each utility district shall cause an audited annual financial report to be made of the books and records of their district. The comptroller of the treasury, through the department of audit, is responsible for determining that such audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards, and that such audits meet the minimum standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury.

In all counties and districts, the comptroller of the treasury shall prepare a uniform audit manual as is required to assure that the books and records are kept in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and that the minimum audit standards prescribed by the comptroller are met. The manual shall not be applied to invalidate obligations contained in bond resolutions or other debt contracts, nor to modify any substantive legal powers or requirements applicable to utility districts.

The audits shall be prepared by certified public accountants, public accountants or by the department of audit. In the event the governing body of the utility district shall fail or refuse to have the audit prepared, then the comptroller of the treasury may appoint a certified public accountant, or public accountant or direct the department to prepare the audit, the cost of such audit to be paid by the utility district.

The comptroller of the treasury is authorized to modify the requirements for an audit as set out in this section for utility districts whose activity, in the comptroller of the treasury's judgment, is not sufficient to justify the expenses of a complete audit. Furthermore, the comptroller of the treasury is authorized to direct the department of audit to make an audit or financial review of the books and records of utility districts.

Within ninety (90) days after the close of the fiscal year of each district organized and operating under this law, the commissioners of the district shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation, published in the county in which the district is situated, a statement showing:

The financial condition of the district at the end of the fiscal year;

The earnings of the district during the fiscal year just ended;

All travel and related costs or expenses where any portion of such costs or expenses is paid by the district or any entity or entities, public or private, associated with the district, including, but not limited to, travel for commissioners and employees;

A statement of the water rates then being charged by the district; and

A brief statement of the method used in arriving at such rates.

A copy of such annual statement and audit shall be filed with the county mayor or mayors where publication is required in accordance with this section and § 7-82-608.

Audits performed by the internal audit staffs of the utility districts shall be conducted in accordance with the standards established by the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to § 4-3-304(9).

Any utility district that is a financially distressed utility district shall be subject to the supervision and evaluation of the utility management review board created pursuant to part 7 of this chapter.

A government joint venture that supplies or treats water or wastewater for wholesale use only to other governments shall not fall under the jurisdiction of the utility management review board for the purpose of reporting negative change in net position annually, but shall be referred to the board if the government joint venture is in a deficit or default position as described in subdivision (g)(3).

For the purposes of this chapter, “financially distressed utility district” means a utility district, and its system or systems, that, as shown by the audited annual financial reports, has either a deficit in total net position, is in default on an indebtedness, or has a negative change in net position for two (2) consecutive years without regard to any grants, capital contributions, or excluded non-cash items. For purposes of this section, “change in net position” means total revenues less all grants, capital contributions, and expenses, but without reduction for any excluded non-cash items. For purposes of this section, “excluded non-cash items” means any non-cash charges arising from changes to or the implementation of pension and other post-employment benefit standards promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board.

Utility districts operating public water systems shall include in their audited annual financial report the utility district's water loss in the manner as prescribed by the utility management review board. Failure of the utility district to include the schedule required in this section constitutes excessive water loss and the utility district shall be referred to the utility management review board. Within sixty (60) days from the time that a utility district's audit is filed with the comptroller of the treasury, the comptroller of the treasury shall file with the utility management review board the audited annual financial report of any utility district operating a water system whose water loss is excessive as established by rules promulgated by the utility management review board.

For the purposes of subdivision (h)(1), “utility district” includes agencies, authorities, or instrumentalities of government created by private act having the authority to administer a water or wastewater facility.

By February 1 of each year, the comptroller of the treasury shall provide a written report to the speaker of the house of representatives and the speaker of the senate listing the average annual water loss contained in the audited annual financial report for those utility districts described in subsection (h).

Acts 1949, ch. 256, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.46 (Williams, § 3695.43a); Acts 1968, ch. 529, § 4; 1975, ch. 139, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2617; Acts 1984, ch. 794, § 4; 1987, ch. 422, § 7; 1989, ch. 139, § 5; 1989, ch. 221, §§ 6, 7; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2004, ch. 619, § 7; 2007, ch. 243, § 1; 2008, ch. 700, § 1; 2009, ch. 72, § 1; 2010, ch. 876, §§ 1, 3; 2011, ch. 392, §§ 1, 4, 12; 2012, ch. 604, § 6; 2013, ch. 141, §§ 2, 3; 2013, ch. 236, § 6; 2014, ch. 628, §§ 7, 8; 2015, ch. 140, § 9; 2017, ch. 129, §§ 3, 4; 2017, ch. 132, § 1; 2018, ch. 495, § 4; 2018, ch. 646, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 6, effective April 19, 2013, purported to amend subsection (i) but failed to take into account the amendment by Acts 2013, ch. 141, § 3, effective April 12, 2013, and therefore could not be given effect.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “and a copy shall be forwarded to the office of the comptroller of the treasury. The failure to file such copies is a Class C misdemeanor.” at the end of (e).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 129, in (a)(2), deleted former (B) which read: “(B) In gas utility districts, and in the counties having the following populations, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent census, the comptroller of the treasury shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are required to assure that the books and records are kept in accordance with generally accepted accounting procedures and that audit standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury are met: not less than nor more than 13,600 13,610 28,500 28,560 28,690 28,750 48,400 48,500”, in the present first sentence, deleted “except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(B),” preceding the first occurrence of “the comptroller of the treasury” and deleted “such” preceding “other rules and regulations”, and substituted “The manual” for “Such manual” at the beginning of the present last sentence; and, in (h)(2), substituted “private act” for “public or private act” and deleted “, other than those agencies, authorities or instrumentalities of government electing pursuant to §68-221-1006(a) or §68-221-1008 to come under the jurisdiction of the water and wastewater financing board” from the end.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 132, in (g)(3), substituted “either a deficit in total net position” for “either deficit total net position” and added “without regard to any grants or capital contributions. For purposes of this section, a “change in net position” means total revenues less all grants, capital contributions, and expenses” at the end.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 495 in (a)(2), in the first sentence, substituted “uniform audit manual as is required” for “uniform accounting manual and shall promulgate other rules and regulations as are required”, substituted “the minimum audit standards prescribed” for “audit standards prescribed”, and substituted “comptroller” for “comptroller of the treasury” near the end; and substituted “The manual” for “The manual and rules” at the beginning of the second sentence.

The 2018 amendment by ch. 646 rewrote (g)(3) which read: “(3) For the purposes of this chapter, a ‘financially distressed utility district’ is a utility district, its system or systems, that, as shown by the audited annual financial reports, has either a deficit in total net position, is in default on an indebtedness, or has a negative change in net position for two (2) consecutive years without regard to any grants or capital contributions. For purposes of this section, a ‘change in net position’ means total revenues less all grants, capital contributions, and expenses.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 140, § 13. April 16, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 129, § 15. April 17, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 132, § 3. April 17, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 495, § 11. February 22, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 646, § 3. April 9, 2018.

Cross-References. Financial statements in multi-county districts, §7-82-608.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Utility management review board's authority over gas utility districts, OAG 99-031, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/18/99).

7-82-402. Protest of rates — Adjustment of complaints — Consumer information records — Fire protection.

Within thirty (30) days of the date on which the statement provided for in § 7-82-401 is published, any customer of the district may file with the commissioners of the district a protest, giving reasons why, in the opinion of the customer, the rates so published are too high or too low. Within a period of fifteen (15) days after the end of this thirty-day period during which such protest may be filed, the commissioners shall notify each such protestant of a hearing to be held by the commissioners on such protests as may have been filed within the thirty-day period prescribed. Upon the hearing date so fixed, which shall be some date within a period of sixty (60) days after giving such notices to the protestants, all such protests shall be heard together by the commissioners. After hearing and examining statements, exhibits and arguments of the protestants or their counsel, the commissioners shall make and spread upon the minutes of the commission their finding as to the reasonableness or unreasonableness of the published rates, and, at the same time, the commission may increase or decrease such rates upon a finding that they are too low or too high, as the case may be.

For the purposes of this part, “customer” means a person who receives a bill for water or sewer services and pays money for such services.

The commissioners shall not be required to receive, consider or act upon any protest filed at any time other than within the thirty-day period provided in this section.

Any protestant feeling aggrieved by the final action of the commissioners under this section may obtain a review of the commissioners' action by simple written request to the utility management review board within thirty (30) days thereafter, with the right to judicial review as provided in § 7-82-702.

It is the duty of the board of commissioners of each utility district to have and maintain a set of rules regarding the adjustment of all complaints that may be made to the district concerning the availability of utility services to persons in need of utility services, the quality of service performed, the adjustment of bills, and all other complaints of any nature, with provision as to the manner of resolution of individual complaints, provision as to the types of complaints that may be resolved by salaried employees of the district, and those that may be resolved only by the board of commissioners. The rules must be posted or otherwise available for convenient inspection by customers and members of the public in the offices of the district. The rules must provide for office employees or other employees of the district to schedule for consideration by the board of commissioners any complaint of such nature as may be decided by the board under its rules, and to schedule for consideration by the board of commissioners the review of any complaint that has not been settled to the satisfaction of the customer or citizen by a salaried employee to whom the settlement of such complaint is delegated.

Each utility district under this chapter shall:

Publish in local telephone directories the telephone number of the district and a telephone number in its service area to be used to report emergencies and for after hours, weekends, and holidays;

Print on its regular billing the address of the office of the district, office hours, if appropriate, the telephone number, and the time and place of the regular meeting of the board of commissioners;

Notify customers of any service interruption that will, or is likely to, last ten (10) hours or longer. Notification may be by public service broadcast over commercial radio stations in the area;

Maintain a log of service interruptions, service restorations, customer complaints and disposition of complaints;

When it is determined by the board to be financially feasible, facilities shall be furnished for fire protection under such arrangements as the district may decide and negotiate with other governmental or private agencies; and

Notify its customers at least once a year that decisions by a utility district board of commissioners on customer complaints may be reviewed by the utility management review board pursuant to § 7-82-702(7), and notify its customers at least once a year of the method used to fill vacancies on the utility district's board of commissioners. This notice may be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the district is situated, along with the statement required to be published under § 7-82-401(d), or may be mailed annually to the district's customers in a separate correspondence, in any annual report or newsletter mailed to the district's customers or other writing provided annually to the district's customers.

Acts 1949, ch. 256, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.46 (Williams, § 3695.43a); Acts 1973, ch. 249, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2618; Acts 1984, ch. 796, § 2; 1992, ch. 788, § 1; 2004, ch. 618, § 3; 2013, ch. 141, § 12; 2015, ch. 140, §§ 3, 6; 2017, ch. 129, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 618, § 1 provided that the act shall be known, and may be cited as, the “Utility District Commissioner Selection Reform Act of 2004”.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a)(1)(A), deleted “water” preceding “customer” twice near the beginning; and, in (a)(1)(B), substituted “water or sewer services” for “water services”.

The 2017 amendment, in (b), deleted “Except in those districts coming within §7-82-103, from and after September 1, 1973,” from the beginning, substituted “set of rules” for “set of rules and regulations” in the first sentence, substituted “The rules must” for “Such rules shall” at the beginning of the second and third sentences, and, in the third sentence, substituted “the board under its rules, and to” for “the board under its rules and regulations, and also to” and substituted “is delegated” for “shall have been delegated” at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 140, § 13. April 16, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 129, § 15. April 17, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction of the utility management review board, OAG 93-26, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (3/29/93).

Utility management review board's authority over gas utility districts, OAG 99-031, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/18/99).

Collateral References.

Profit factor in determining rates for municipally owned or operated public utility. 90 A.L.R. 700.

Right of municipality to refuse services provided by it to resident for failure of resident to pay for other unrelated services. 60 A.L.R.3d 714.

7-82-403. Rates sufficient to pay costs and retire bonds.

The board of commissioners of any district shall prescribe and collect reasonable rates, fees, tolls, or charges for the services, facilities and commodities of its system or systems, shall prescribe penalties for the nonpayment of the rates, fees, tolls, or charges, and shall revise such rates, fees, tolls or charges from time to time whenever necessary to ensure that such system or systems shall be and always remain self-supporting. The rates, fees, tolls or charges prescribed shall be such as will always produce revenue at least sufficient to:

Provide for all expenses of operation and maintenance of the system or systems, including reserves for the expenses; and

Pay when due all bonds and interest on the bonds, for the payment of which such revenues are or shall have been pledged, charged or otherwise encumbered, including reserves for the bonds and interest.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.40 (Williams, § 3695.39); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2625; Acts 1987, ch. 422, § 8; 1989, ch. 139, § 6; 1989, ch. 221, § 8; 2011, ch. 392, § 13; 2012, ch. 674, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Refinancing of bonds, authorized, §7-82-507.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7; 25 Tenn. Juris., Water Companies and Waterworks, §§ 4, 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Utility district supply contracts, OAG 93-59, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 59 (9/3/93).

A utility district created under the Utility District Law of 1937, T.C.A. §7-82-101 et seq., has the authority to charge a sewer fee to a property owner to whom it makes sewer service available, even though the property owner is not connected, OAG 02-051, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 52 (4/22/02).

A utility district is authorized to contribute funds to its local chamber of commerce, its county government, or its county's nonprofit economic development corporation for economic development activities aimed at increasing development in the district's service area in anticipation of increasing its customer base and service loads, OAG 03-017, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/19/03).

Requirements for utility rates, OAG 05-165 (10/25/05).

“Growth and Development Fees” and “Impact Fees” levied by local utilities. OAG 12-11, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (2/3/12).